nouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl 
+1SgPos +2SgPos +3SgPos 
+1PlPos +2PlPos +3PlPos 
+Nom +Abl +Loc +Acc +Dat +Gen 
+1SgPrd +2SgPrd +2HnPrd +3SgPrd 
+1PlPrd +2PlPrd +3PlPrd
+AsmDbt +AsmGs1 +AsmGs2
+Qst +QstCmp +QstAfr
+AsmQst +AsmQstSrp +AsmQstDbt
+Srp
+Neg +Abs
+Ehn +Eaf
+Dmn1 +Dmn2 +Dmn3 +Dmn4 +Dmn5 +Dmn6
+Drg1 +Drg2 +Drg3 +Drg4
+Sep
+Prn
+Adz
+Bnd
+Blg
+Cmp1
+Cmp2
+Cmp3
+Act1
+Act2

LEXICON Root
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun
xola Ninf;
kitob Ninf;

LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:0 #;
+N+Pl:^lar #;

+N+Sg:0 Possessive;
+N+Sg:0 Inflectional;
+N+Sg:0 Predicative;
+N+Sg:0 Assumption;
+N+Sg:0 Question;
+N+Sg:0 AssumptionQuestion;
+N+Sg:0 Surprise;
+N+Sg:0 Negative;
+N+Sg:0 Absence;
+N+Sg:0 EnhancedHonorific;
+N+Sg:0 EnhancedAffirmative;
+N+Sg:0 Diminutive;
+N+Sg:0 Derogative;
+N+Sg:0 Separative;
+N+Sg:0 Pronominalazing;
+N+Sg:0 Adjectivizing;
+N+Sg:0 Boundary;
+N+Sg:0 Belong;
+N+Sg:0 Comparative;
+N+Sg:0 Accentuative;

! +N+Sg:0 Possessive;
! +N+Pl:^lar Possessive;

! +N+Sg:0 MainSuffix;
! +N+Pl:^lar MainSuffix;

! +N+Sg:0 Predicative;
! +N+Pl:^lar PredicativePlural;

LEXICON Possessive
+1SgPos:^m #;
+2SgPos:^ng #;
+3SgPos:^i #;
+1PlPos:^miz #;
+2PlPos:^ngiz #;

LEXICON Inflectional
+Nom:^0 #;
+Abl:^dan #;
+Loc:^da #;
+Acc:^ni #;
+Dat:^ga #;
+Gen:^ning #;

LEXICON Predicative
PredicativeSingular;
PredicativePlural;

LEXICON PredicativeSingular
+1SgPrd:^man #;
+2SgPrd:^san #;
+2HnPrd:^siz #;
+3SgPrd:^0 #;

LEXICON PredicativePlural
+1PlPrd:^miz #;
+2PlPrd:^sizlar #;
+3PlPrd:^lar #;

! Gumon
LEXICON Assumption
+AsmDbt:^mish #; ! Doubting
+AsmGs1:^dir #; ! Apparent Guess
+AsmGs2:^ov #; ! Doubt and Assumption

LEXICON Question
+Qst:^mi #; ! Question
+QstCmp:^-chi #; ! Comparing Question
+QstAfr:^-a #; ! Tag Question

LEXICON AssumptionQuestion
+AsmQst:^mi #;
+AsmQstSrp:^-ya #;
+AsmQstDbt:^mikan #; ! Doubt Question

LEXICON Surprise
+Srp:^chi #;

LEXICON Negative
+Neg:^mas #; ! Denotes the negation

LEXICON Absence
+Abs:^siz #; ! Denotes the absence

LEXICON EnhancedHonorific
+Ehn:^lar #;

LEXICON EnhancedAffirmative
+Eaf:^dir #; 

LEXICON Diminutive
+Dmn1:^jon #;
+Dmn2:^xon #;
+Dmn3:^cha #;
+Dmn4:^kay #;
+Dmn5:^chak #;
+Dmn6:^gina #;

LEXICON Derogative
+Drg1:^cha #;
+Drg2:^kay #;
+Drg3:^gina #;
+Drg4:^cha #;

LEXICON Separative
+Sep:^gina #;

LEXICON Pronominalazing
+Prn:^niki #;

LEXICON Adjectivizing
+Adz:^dagi #;

LEXICON Boundary
+Bnd:^gacha #;

LEXICON Belong
+Blg:^ligi #;

LEXICON Comparative
+Cmp1:^cha #;
+Cmp2:^chalik #;
+Cmp3:^dek #;

LEXICON Accentuative
+Act1:^-ku #;
+Act2:^-da #;
